District of Columbia statutes.
22-3134

Penalties.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a person who violates § 22-3133 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 12 months, or both.

(b)

A person who violates § 22-3133 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both, if the person:

(1)

At the time, was subject to a court, parole, or supervised release order prohibiting contact with the specific individual;

(2)

Has one prior conviction in any jurisdiction of stalking any person within the previous 10 years;

(3)

At the time, was at least 4 years older than the specific individual and the specific individual was less than 18 years of age; or

(4)

Caused more than $ 2,500 in financial injury.

(c)

A person who violates § 22-3133 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both, if the person has 2 or more prior convictions in any jurisdiction for stalking any person, at least one of which was for a jury demandable offense.

(d)

A person shall not be sentenced consecutively for stalking and identify theft based on the same act or course of conduct.

History

Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 504, 56 DCR 7413
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 213(d), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (a), for “not more than $10,000” in (b), and for “not more than $25,000” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 504 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 504 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 213(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.